Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 9 Georgia Merchant Acquirer Limited Purpose Bank

Administrative rules and regulations.

Merchant acquirer limited purpose banks, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Chapter 80-12.

7-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Merchant Acquirer Limited Purpose Bank Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on business corporations, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2012).

7-9-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

(1.1)

“Control person” means any individual who directs the affairs or controls or establishes policy for a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

“Corporation” means a corporation organized under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, territory, or dependency of the United States or under the laws of a foreign country.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Eligible organization” means a corporation that at all times maintains an office in the State of Georgia at which it or its parent, affiliates, or subsidiaries employ at least 250 persons residing in this state who are directly or indirectly engaged in merchant acquiring activities or settlement activities, including providing the following services related to merchant acquiring activities or settlement activities, either for the eligible organization or on behalf of others:

Administrative support;

Information technology support;

Financial support; and

Tax and finance support.

“Holding company” means any company that controls a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. For purposes of this paragraph, the terms “company” and “control” shall have the meanings set forth in Code Section 7-1-605.

“Merchant” means an individual or entity authorized by a payment card network to accept payments in exchange for goods or services.

“Merchant acquirer limited purpose bank” means a corporation organized under this chapter and the activities of which are limited to those permitted under Code Section 7-9-12.

“Merchant acquiring activities” means the various activities associated with effecting transactions within payment card networks, including obtaining and maintaining membership in one or more payment card networks; signing up and underwriting merchants to accept payment card network branded payment cards; providing the means to authorize valid card transactions at client merchant locations; facilitating the clearing and settlement of the transactions through a payment card network; providing access to one or more payment card networks to merchant acquirer limited purpose bank affiliates, customers, or customers of its affiliates; sponsoring the participation of merchant acquirer limited purpose bank affiliates, customers, or customers of its affiliates in one or more payment card networks; and conducting such other activities as may be necessary, convenient, or incidental to effecting transactions within payment card networks.

(8.1)

“Merchant funds” means funds received by a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank as a result of its performance of clearing, settlement, or any other authorized activities which are ultimately payable to a merchant.

“Payment card network” means any organization, group, system, or other collection of individuals or entities that is organized to allow participants to accept or make payments for goods or services using a credit card, debit card, or any other payment device.

“Self-acquiring activities” means the act of a merchant, for itself or through an affiliated entity, engaging in merchant acquiring or settlement activities on its own behalf for payments it, or its affiliated entity, receives for goods and services it, or its affiliated entity, provides to consumers.

“Settlement activities” means the processing of payment card transactions to send to a payment card network for processing, to make payments to a merchant, and, ultimately, for cardholder billing.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2014, p. 226, § 1/HB 883; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 35/HB 184.

7-9-3.
Chartering of merchant acquirer limited purpose banks; regulation limited.

A corporation that performs merchant acquiring activities or settlement activities in this state may elect to obtain a charter from the department. Those corporations chartered by the department shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted by the department for purposes of regulating chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose banks. The department shall have no authority to regulate a corporation performing merchant acquiring activities or settlement activities that has not been chartered by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-4.
Application; fees; minimum number of employees.

A corporation that seeks to be chartered shall file an application with the department and shall pay applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the costs of the investigation and review of the application.

The department shall, by regulation, prescribe annual examination fees, charter fees, registration fees, and supervision fees to be paid by each merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. In addition, the department may, by regulation, prescribe reasonable application and related fees, special investigation fees, hearing fees, and fees to provide copies of any book, account, report, or other paper filed in its office or for any certification thereof or for processing any papers as required by this title. The department, in its discretion, may require the payment of such fees in any manner deemed to be efficient, including collection through automated clearing-house arrangements or other electronic means, so that the state receives funds no later than the date the payment is required to be made. The department is authorized to net the fees authorized in this subsection to recover any costs incurred by the department related to any investigation or examination of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

The merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have, within one year after the date it receives its charter, no fewer than 50 employees located in this state devoted to merchant acquiring activities; provided, however, that a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may contract with an eligible organization for the performance of merchant acquiring activities, settlement activities, or any of the other services identified in paragraph (4) of Code Section 7-9-2, and when a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank enters into such contracts with an eligible organization for merchant acquiring activities, settlement activities, or any other services identified in paragraph (4) of Code Section 7-9-2, the minimum number of employees in this state shall be determined by the commissioner at a level to assure the continued and substantive presence of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank in this state for the purpose of conducting its corporate affairs and operations. If a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank contracts with an eligible organization that is an affiliate of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, the commissioner shall consider the eligible organization’s or its parent’s, affiliates’, or subsidiaries’ employees engaged on behalf of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank as employees of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank for purposes of complying with this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 36/HB 184; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that a merchant” for “provided, however, a merchant” in the proviso of the first sentence of subsection (c).

7-9-5.
Articles of incorporation; filing; publication; registered agent; administration by board of directors.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have articles of incorporation signed by the incorporator and shall set forth in the English language:

The name of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

The street address and county where the main office will be located;

The name of the initial registered agent;

The street address where its initial registered office will be located;

A statement that “This corporation is subject to the ‘Georgia Merchant Acquirer Limited Purpose Bank Act’ ”;

The aggregate number of shares which the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have authority to issue, and:

If the shares are to consist of one class only, the par value of each of the shares; or

If the shares are to be divided into classes, the number of shares of each class, the par value of each share of each class, a description of each class, and a statement of the preferences, redemption provisions, qualifications, limitations, restrictions, and the special or relative rights granted to or imposed upon the shares of each class;

The term for which the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank is to exist, which shall be perpetual unless otherwise limited; and

Any provision not inconsistent with law which the incorporators may choose to include for the regulation of the internal affairs and business of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

It shall not be necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation any of the corporate or operational powers set forth in this chapter.

The applicant shall file with the department the articles of incorporation, together with any fee required by the department. Such filing shall constitute an application for a charter and approval to operate as a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. Immediately upon the filing of the articles of incorporation, the department shall certify a copy of the articles and return it to the applicant, who shall, in conformity with Code Section 7-1-7 and on the next business day following the filing of the articles, transmit for publication in the newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank will be located a copy of the articles or, in lieu thereof, a statement that reads substantially as follows:

“An application for a charter to operate as a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to be known as the
_______________
and to be located at
_______________
in
_______________
County, Georgia, will be made to the Secretary of State of Georgia in accordance with Chapter 9 of Title 7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Georgia Merchant Acquirer Limited Purpose Bank Act.’ A copy of the articles of incorporation of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank and the application have been filed with the Department of Banking and Finance.”

The articles of incorporation or the statement must be published once a week for two consecutive weeks with the first publication occurring within ten days of receipt by the newspaper of the articles of incorporation or statement.

Each merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall name a registered agent and inform the department and the Secretary of State of its current registered agent.

The administration of business and affairs of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be the responsibility of a board of directors consisting of at least three directors, a majority of whom shall be residents of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 37/HB 184.

7-9-5.1.
Meetings.

The board of directors shall hold regular meetings at such times as may be fixed by the bylaws and shall, at all times, be subject to call by the chairperson of the board, the chief executive officer, the president, or any two members of the board. The board shall meet at least once in ten different months of each calendar year unless an alternative schedule is approved in writing by the department, but in no event shall the board meet less frequently than once in each calendar quarter.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws:

A majority of all the directors in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and actions of a majority of those present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be actions of the board;

The board of directors may designate by resolution three or more of its number to constitute an executive committee or other committee which, to the extent provided in such resolution, shall have and exercise the authority of the board of directors in regard to the business of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank; and

Any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or of the members of an executive or other committee may be taken without a meeting if a consent or consents in writing setting forth the action shall be signed by all of the directors or all of the members of the executive or other committee and filed with the secretary of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-5.2.
Bylaws.

The board of directors shall have the power to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws governing the regulation and management of affairs of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank unless such power is reserved exclusively to the shareholders by the articles or bylaws previously adopted by shareholders; provided, however, that any bylaws adopted by the board of directors may be altered, amended, or repealed and new bylaws adopted by shareholders. Shareholders may prescribe that any bylaw or bylaws adopted shall not be altered, amended, or repealed by the board of directors. Copies of the bylaws and any change, addition, or amendment thereto shall be filed with the department immediately upon adoption by the directors or the shareholders.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-5.3.
Merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall maintain a chief executive officer, chief information officer, chief risk officer, and such other officers the department may require by rule or regulation. A person may hold more than one office; provided, however, that no person shall serve as both chief executive officer and chief risk officer.

Except as otherwise provided for in the articles or bylaws, the board of directors shall elect officers, fix their compensation, and fill vacancies. An officer elected or appointed by the board may be removed without prejudice to any contract right of such officer upon determination by the board that such removal is in the best interests of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall immediately notify the department in writing upon a change in the position of chief executive officer or president.

Officers of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have such authority and perform such duties as provided for in the bylaws adopted by the board.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may employ such agents or employees as necessary for the prompt and orderly discharge of its business.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-5.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-5.4.
Oath of office; administration of affairs.

Prior to assuming office, each director shall take an oath or affirmation that he or she will diligently and honestly perform his or her duties in the administration of the affairs of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank; he or she will not permit a willful violation of law by the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank; and he or she meets the eligibility requirements of this chapter, the regulations of the department, and the articles and bylaws of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

Each director shall sign a copy of the oath required by this Code section and include such documentation in the meeting minutes. No director shall participate in the affairs of the board or receive any compensation for service as a director until such oath has been executed. Any person seeking to act in the capacity of a director before subscribing to the oath required by this Code section or otherwise qualifying for service pursuant to the bylaws of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or the laws and regulations governing the operations of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be liable for his or her actions to the same extent as if that person had qualified to serve as a director of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-5.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-6.
Information to be included on charter application.

An application to the department to charter a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall include:

Any information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed institution which shall be made available in the form specified by the department;

A certificate of the Secretary of State showing that the proposed name of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank has been reserved pursuant to Code Section 7-1-131; and

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expense of the investigation required by Code Section 7-9-7.

An application to the department to own or control a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall include:

Any information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed transaction which shall be made available in the form specified by the department; and

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expense of the investigation.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-7.
Investigation; approval or disapproval of charter application; “conviction data” defined; background checks; impact of disapproval.

Upon receipt of the articles of incorporation and the filings and fees from the applicant as required under this chapter, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether it should approve the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The department shall approve the charter of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank if it determines in its discretion that:

The articles of incorporation and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The character and fitness of the applicant, directors, and proposed officers are such as to warrant the belief that the business of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank will be honestly and efficiently conducted; and

The capital structure of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank is adequate in relation to the amount and character of the anticipated business of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles of incorporation and the filings and fees from the applicant as required by this chapter, the department shall approve or disapprove the charter of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The department may impose conditions to be satisfied prior to the issuance of its approval of the charter of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. If the department, in its discretion, approves the charter of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank with or without conditions, it shall deliver its written approval of the articles of incorporation and charter to the Secretary of State and notify the applicant of its action. If the department, in its discretion, disapproves the charter of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, it shall notify the applicant of its disapproval of the charter and state generally the unfavorable factors influencing its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

No charter shall be issued if the department finds that the applicant, or any holding company, control person, director, officer, partner, or employee of the applicant, has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. No control person, director, officer, partner, or employee of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. For any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank that is transacting business under a charter approved by the department, the department shall have the suspension and removal powers provided for in Code Section 7-1-71 with respect to any control person, director, officer, partner, or employee of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank who has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. For the purposes of this article, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof, and regardless of whether first offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was entered, or an adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on that charge, unless and until such plea of guilty or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or until probation, sentence, or both probation and sentence of a first offender have been successfully completed and documented, or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon thereon from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred, or shall have received an official certification of pardon granted by the state’s pardoning body where the conviction occurred which removes the legal disabilities resulting from such conviction and restores civil and political rights.

As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding, verdict, or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought. The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any applicant, holding company, merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, or person who is a control person, director, officer, partner, or employee of the applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The department may directly submit to the Georgia Crime Information Center two complete sets of fingerprints of such person, together with the required records search fees and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be sent to the department by applicants and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks together with such fingerprints.

Upon request by the department, each applicant, holding company, or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or any person who is a control person, director, officer, partner, or employee of the applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprints, the required records search fees, and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be submitted to the department by applicants and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks together with two complete sets of fingerprints, and the department is authorized to net such fees to recover any costs incurred by the department related to running the background checks. Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there is no such finding. All conviction data received by the department or by the applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be used by the party requesting such data for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of this article, shall not be a public record, shall be confidential, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect the file. All such records shall be maintained by the department and the applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable.

Every applicant and merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be authorized and required to obtain and maintain the results of background checks on employees. Such background checks shall be handled by the Georgia Crime Information Center pursuant to Code Section 35-3-34 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center. Applicants and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks shall be responsible for any applicable fees charged by the Georgia Crime Information Center. An applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may only employ a person whose background data has been checked and been found to be in compliance with all lawful requirements prior to the initial date of hire. This provision does not apply to control persons, directors, officers, or partners, whose backgrounds have been investigated through the department before taking office, beginning employment, or securing ownership. Upon receipt of information from the Georgia Crime Information Center that is incomplete or that indicates an employee has a criminal record in any state other than Georgia, the employer shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprints for such person, together with the applicable fees and any other required information. The department shall submit such fingerprints as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Upon request by the department, an applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank must take all steps necessary to have an international criminal history background check performed on any control person, director, officer, partner, or employee. The results of such international criminal history background check must be provided to the department.

Applicants and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks shall have the primary responsibility for obtaining background checks on employees. The department shall be entitled to review the files of any applicant or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to determine whether the required background checks have been run and whether all employees are qualified. The department shall be authorized to discuss the status of employee background checks with applicants or merchant acquirer limited purpose banks. Notwithstanding any other provisions in this article, the department shall retain the right to obtain conviction data on employees of applicants and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks.

In the event the department denies an application to charter a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or an application to own or control a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, the applicant may submit a new application at any time following notice of final denial. The applicant shall not be prejudiced by any prior denials by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 38/HB 184; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 7/HB 737.

7-9-8.
Issuance of certificate of incorporation by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall immediately issue a certificate of incorporation to a proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank upon submission of:

Written approval of the articles of incorporation by the department with a copy attached;

An affidavit executed by the duly authorized agent or publisher of a newspaper swearing that the articles of incorporation or a summary statement publication as provided for in Code Section 7-9-5 have been published; and

All required fees and charges required by law

so long as name of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank continues to be reserved or is available. The Secretary of State shall retain on file a copy of the certificate, the articles of incorporation, the department’s approval of the articles of incorporation, and the publisher’s certificate.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-9.
Corporate existence; shareholders; authority to regulate and supervise sale of shares; legal effect of incorporation certificate; when business may begin.

The corporate existence of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall begin upon the issuance of a certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State. Those persons who subscribed for shares prior to filing of the articles, or their assignees, shall be shareholders in the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The department shall have full authority to regulate and supervise the activities of promoters, incorporators, subscribers for shares, and all persons soliciting offers to subscribe for shares in any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank established under this chapter. Any corporation in the process of seeking approval of a charter as a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be classified as a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank in formation and persons named in the articles of incorporation or approved by the department as initial directors of such entity shall not be considered “agents” or “broker-dealers” as defined in Code Section 10-5-2.

A certificate of incorporation shall be conclusive evidence that a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank has been incorporated; however, the state may institute proceedings to dissolve, wind up, and terminate a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank in conformity with Code Section 7-1-92 and applicable provisions of this chapter.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may begin business when:

Capital stock of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank satisfies the requirements of Code Section 7-9-11;

Bylaws of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank have been filed with the department;

A registered agent and registered office for the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank has been designated in conformity with Code Section 7-1-132;

The merchant acquirer limited purpose bank has been organized and is ready to begin the business for which it was incorporated;

All conditions imposed by the department in giving its approval of the charter of the proposed merchant acquirer limited purpose bank under this chapter have been satisfied; and

The department has received an affidavit attesting that the requirements of this subsection have been satisfied signed by the president or secretary and at least a majority of the directors of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-10.
Liability of applicant beginning business before authorized.

The applicant who charters a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank which transacts business before its capital stock have been paid in as required under this chapter shall be jointly and severally liable to creditors for the amounts not paid in by subscribers or any other deficiencies. Such liability shall be deemed an asset of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank and may be enforced by it, its successors or assignees, by a shareholder suing derivatively, or by a receiver appointed by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-11.
Capital stock and paid-in surplus requirements.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall at all times maintain capital stock and paid-in surplus as required by policies of the department but in no event less than $3 million.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

7-9-11.1.
Merger or consolidation of limited purpose bank; compliance with provisions of Chapter 9.

Merchant acquirer limited purpose banks may merge or consolidate upon compliance with the requirements of this chapter and other applicable laws and regulations.

A corporation other than a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may be merged into or may be consolidated with a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, provided that:

The resulting institution of the merger or consolidation is a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

The resulting institution of the merger or consolidation holds only assets and liabilities and is engaged only in activities which may be held or engaged in by a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank; and

The merger or consolidation is not otherwise unlawful.

A merger or consolidation pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be made by compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Title 14 shall not be applicable to such a merger or consolidation.

In the case of a merger of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank with any other corporation or corporations, with the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank as the resulting entity, any assets, lines of business, activities, or powers which may accrue to the resulting entity which would be prohibited for a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be provided for in the plan of merger. Such plan shall include a proposal for the disposal of such prohibited assets or the termination of such prohibited line of business, activity, or power. The department shall review such plan to determine whether the prohibited asset, line of business, activity, or power should be a basis for denial of the requested merger or consolidation or phased out within a reasonable period of time, which shall be determined by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.2.
Terms and conditions of merger or consolidation.

The parties to a merger or consolidation of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall:

Adopt a plan stating the method, terms, and conditions of the merger or consolidation, including the rights under the plan of the shareholders of each of the parties and any agreement concerning the merger or consolidation. Such plan shall specify:

The name that such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have upon and after such merger or consolidation;

The persons who shall constitute the board of directors of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank after the merger or consolidation;

The manner and basis of converting the shares of each merged or consolidated entity into shares or other securities or obligations of the surviving merchant acquirer limited purpose bank and, if any shares of any of the merged or consolidated entities are not to be converted solely into shares or other securities of the surviving merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, the amount of cash or securities of any other corporation, or combination of cash and such securities, which is to be paid or delivered to the holders of such shares in exchange for, or upon the surrender of, such shares. Such cash or securities may be in addition to, or in lieu of, the shares or other securities of the surviving merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or consolidation which are deemed desirable to the parties of the merger or consolidation plan; and

Any other requirements of the department, adopted through rule or regulation, deemed essential to ensure protection of creditors or shareholders of the merging or consolidating entities;

Adopt a merger or consolidation plan upon affirmative vote of at least:

A majority of the directors; and

At a meeting of shareholders, a majority of the shareholders entitled to cast votes or the majority of holders of outstanding shares of a class, if a class of shares is entitled to vote thereon as a class; and

Include a copy or summary of the merger or consolidation plan and a full statement of the rights and remedies of dissenting shareholders, the method of exercising such rights, and any limitations on such rights and remedies in the meeting notice for which a merger or consolidation is to be voted upon.

Any modification of a merger or consolidation plan which has been adopted shall be made by any method provided therein or, in the absence of such provision, by the same vote as required for adoption.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.